Illinois, session 104th, SB3203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section. 5. The amount of $700,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to the Illinois Center for Employee 8Ownership for the purpose of expanding education, outreach, 9and technical assistance related to employee ownership 10transitions and supporting small businesses in evaluating and 11pursuing succession through employee ownership. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.